src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-leeqd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - leeʹd: # Verb 'to be' - full paradigm
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: leäm
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: leäk
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lij
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl1: leäʹp
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [leäʹped, leʹped]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [lie, liâ, lee] 
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg4: leäʹt

     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: leʹjjem
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [leʹjjiǩ, leʹjjeǩ]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: leäi
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [leeiʹm, leʹjjim]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [leeiʹd, leʹjjid]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: leʹjje
     leeʹd+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg4: leʹjješ

     leeʹd+V+IV+Pot+Sg1: leʹžžem
     leeʹd+V+IV+Pot+Sg2: leʹžžiǩ
     leeʹd+V+IV+Pot+Sg3: [leežž, leež]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: [leʹžžep, leʹžžim, leʹžžin]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: leʹžžveʹted
     leeʹd+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: leʹžže
     leeʹd+V+IV+Pot+Sg4: leʹžžet
     leeʹd+V+IV+Pot+ConNeg: leʹžže

     leeʹd+V+IV+Cond+Sg1: leʹččem
     leeʹd+V+IV+Cond+Sg2: [leʹččiǩ, leʹččeǩ]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Cond+Sg3: leʹčči
     leeʹd+V+IV+Cond+Pl1: [leʹččim, leʹččep, leʹččin]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Cond+Pl2: leʹččid
     leeʹd+V+IV+Cond+Pl3: leʹčče
     leeʹd+V+IV+Cond+Sg4: leʹččeš
     leeʹd+V+IV+Cond+ConNeg: leʹčče

     leeʹd+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: leäkku
     leeʹd+V+IV+Imprt+Sg3: leäǥǥas
     leeʹd+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: leäkkap
     leeʹd+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [leäkku, leäkkveʹted]
     leeʹd+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: leäkkaz
     leeʹd+V+IV+Imprt+ConNeg: leäkku
     leeʹd+V+IV+Act+PrsPrc: leʹddi
     leeʹd+V+IV+Act+PrfPrc: [leämmaž, leämma, leäm]

#     leeʹd+V+IV+Imprt+ConNeg: iʹlleäkku
#     leeʹd+V+IV+Actio+Ess: åårmen
#     leeʹd+V+IV+Actio: åårram
#     leeʹd+V+IV+Act+PrfPrc: [iʹlleäm, iʹllääm, jeäʹlääm]
#     leeʹd+V+IV+Pass+PrfPrc:
#     leeʹd+V+IV+VAbess: åårǩâni
#     leeʹd+V+IV+Ger+Ess:
#     leeʹd+V+IV+Ger+Instr: 
